Utah statutes.
20A-7-205.5.   Initial disclosures -- Paid circulators.

(1)  When petitions are being circulated by paid circulators, the sponsors of the initiative shall file a report with the lieutenant governor on the second Tuesday in March of the year of the regular general election and on the Tuesday before the regular general election.

(2)  The report shall contain:

(a)  the names of the sponsors; and

(b)  the name of the proposed measure for which petitions are being circulated by paid circulators.



Amended by Chapter 237, 2008 General Session

